Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1150 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section, the term "cultivated meat"
means a meat or meat product that was produced from cultured animal
HB2829 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

tiss ue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the
animal from which the cells were derived.
B. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture,
sell, hold or offer for sale, or distribute any cultivated meat
product in this state.
2. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.
C. 1. A seller of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and 1-
1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that sells or distributes
cultivated meat products in violation of subsection B of this
section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as provided by
rule of the Oklahoma State Department of Health.
2. The license of a seller of food may be suspended or revoked,
as provided by rule of the Oklahoma State Department of Health upon
the conviction of an owner or an employee of the licensed seller of
food for a violation of subsection B of this section.
D. The Oklahoma State Department of Health may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this section.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing any
federal, state, or local governmental entity or institution of
higher education, or a person that is partnered with a governmental
entity or institution of higher education as evidenced by a formal
agreement, from conducting research in this state regarding the
production of cultivated meat products.
HB2829 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.





















HB2829 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.